New York, session 2025-2026, S9900.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 581 of the laws of 2005, amending the 2 local finance law relating to statutory installment bonds, as amended by 3 chapter 341 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall remain in full 5 force and effect until September 30, [2026] 2029, at which time it shall 6 expire and be deemed repealed. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15005-01-6